Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201179-852
Collective-bargaining
agreement; continued; effect.

The collective-bargaining
agreement of the school district or districts forming the unified system or
reorganized school district with the largest number of teacher employees shall
continue in full force and effect and govern all teachers in the unified system
or reorganized school district until replaced by a successor agreement, and
the teachers employed by the unified system or reorganized school district
and previously employed by the school districts involved in the formation
of the unified system or reorganized school district shall automatically be
included in that bargaining unit but no certificated public school employee
shall be compelled to join any organization or association. If only one collective-bargaining
agreement is in effect in the school districts which are a part of the unification
or reorganization, that collective-bargaining agreement shall continue in
full force and effect until replaced by a successor agreement and the teachers
employed by the other school districts involved in the unification or reorganization
shall automatically be included in that bargaining unit. For purposes of the
Industrial Relations Act, the unified system shall be deemed a
public employer as defined in section 48-801.

Laws 1980, LB 844, § 3;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-12,106;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 482;

Laws 1998, LB 1219, § 3;

Laws 2011, LB397, § 17.

Industrial Relations Act, see section 48-801.01.